Washington statutes.
RCW 41.47.050

Contingent effective date.

This chapter shall take effect at the time and in the manner provided by the state Constitution unless at that time the federal social security act has not been amended to cover officials and employees of the state, county, city and other municipal corporations and political subdivisions, in which event it shall take effect and become operative on the first day of the second month following the month when such federal act shall become applicable to such state officials and employees.

[ 1941 c 205 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9998-61. Formerly RCW 74.40.050.]